Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1551
Litter receptacles; owner or operator provide and maintain; penalty.

It shall be the responsibility of any person owning or operating any establishment or public place in which litter receptacles are required by section 81-1550 to procure and place such receptacles at his or her own expense on the premises and to maintain the same in accord with rules and regulations adopted by the council. Any person who fails to place such litter receptacles on the premises in the numbers required or to maintain such receptacles in the manner required shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 18;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 10.
September 30, 2030